New York, session 2025-2026, A5364.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 1903 of the real 2 property tax law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (xxvii) to read 3 as follows: 4 (xxvii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in an approved 5 assessing unit in the town of Haverstraw, county of Rockland and for 6 current base proportions to be determined by taxes based on such 7 approved assessing unit's two thousand twenty-five--two thousand twen- 8 ty-six assessment rolls, the current base proportion of any class shall 9 not exceed the adjusted base proportion or adjusted proportion, whichev- 10 er is appropriate, of the immediately preceding year, by more than one 11 percent, provided that such approved assessing unit has passed a local 12 law, ordinance or resolution providing therefor. Where the computation 13 of current base proportions would otherwise produce such result, the 14 current base proportion of such class or classes shall be limited to 15 such one percent increase and the legislative body of such approved 16 assessing unit shall alter the current base proportion of either class 17 so that the sum of the current base proportions equals one. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07485-01-5